Hawaii statutes.
[§271G-23.5] Notice of hearing
required. (a) Whenever the commission conducts a public hearing on an
application for a certificate pursuant to section 271G-10, the commission shall
provide reasonable notice in writing to the applicant for a certificate and to
the public on each island that will be affected by the proposed service of the
fact of the public hearing and the matter to be considered. Notice pursuant to
this section shall be provided at least thirty days before the date fixed by
the commission for the public hearing.

(b) Notice provided pursuant to this section
shall plainly state the proposed operations, routes, and services of the
applicant and the proposed effective date. Notice under this section shall be
effective upon compliance with subsection (c); provided that the commission
shall retain and make available for public inspection copies of all notices and
related documents issued pursuant to this section.

(c) Any public hearing held pursuant to
section 271G-10(c) shall be a noticed public hearing or hearings on the island
or islands to which the water carrier proposes to provide services or which
will be affected by the proposed service. Notice of the hearing, its purpose,
and the date, time, and place at which it will open shall be given not less
than once in each of three weeks on each island in the county or counties to
which the water carrier proposes to provide services or which will be affected
by the proposed service. The first notice shall be given not less than
twenty-one days before the public hearing and the last notice shall be given
not more than two days before the public hearing. [L 2011, c 213, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next